Utah statutes.
63M-1-705.   Business team consultants.

(1)  The office may enter into work agreements with business team consultants through a request for proposal process to participate in the Technology Commercialization and Innovation Program.

(2)  Under a work agreement, a business team consultant shall assist a college or university in facilitating the transition of its technology into industry.

